Georgia, session 2025_26, HB807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a homestead exemption from all City of Woodstock ad valorem taxes for
city purposes for the full value of the homestead after a two-year phase-in period for certain
residents of that city who are 62 years of age or older, approved April 13, 2001 (Ga. L. 2001,
H. B. 807
- 1 -

LC 47 3565/AP
p. 3793), as amended, particularly by an Act approved February 19, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p.
3560), is amended by revising subsection (b) of Section 1 as follows:
"(b)(1) Each resident of the City of Woodstock who is a senior citizen is granted an
exemption on that person's homestead from all City of Woodstock ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes in the amount of the full value of that homestead, provided that such
resident or his or her spouse was lawfully granted a homestead exemption on his or her
current or former homestead within the city limits for at least five years before his or her
application for the exemption allowed under this subsection. Such five years are not
required to run consecutively or immediately precede such resident's application.
(2) Each resident of the City of Woodstock who was lawfully granted a homestead
exemption on his or her homestead under this section as it existed prior to the first day
of January of the year immediately prior to the effective date of this subsection and who
is a senior citizen shall be granted the homestead exemption allowed under paragraph (1)
of this subsection on his or her homestead within the city limits, without regard to the
five-year requirement, for each year that he or she is a senior citizen.
(3) Each resident of the City of Woodstock who is the surviving spouse of an individual
who was granted the exemption under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be
granted the exemption allowed under paragraph (1) of this subsection on his or her
homestead within the city limits, without regard to the five-year requirement, for each
year that such surviving spouse is a senior citizen."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
H. B. 807
- 2 -

LC 47 3565/AP
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Woodstock shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Woodstock for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent shall
conduct that election on any permissible special election date under Code Section 21-2-540
of the O.C.G.A., but not later than the November, 2026, general election and shall issue the
call and conduct such election as provided by general law. The municipal election
superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Cherokee
County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which clarifies the five-year residency
( ) NO requirement for a homestead exemption from City of Woodstock ad
valorem taxes for municipal purposes for residents who are 62 years of age
or older and waives such residency requirement for any such resident's
surviving spouse?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on the first day of January following the date of such election. If the Act is not so
approved or if the election is not conducted as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act
shall not become effective, and this Act shall be automatically repealed on July 1, 2027. The
expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Woodstock. It shall be the municipal
election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal election superintendent and
are not intended as directory. If the municipal election superintendent fails or refuses to
comply with this section, any elector of the City of Woodstock may apply for a writ of
mandamus to compel the municipal election superintendent to perform his or her duties
H. B. 807
- 3 -

LC 47 3565/AP
under this section. If the court finds that the municipal election superintendent has not
complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal
election superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date required by this section
or on the next date authorized for special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540
of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 807
- 4 -